Utah statutes.
58-1-301.7.   Change of information.

(1) (a)  An applicant, licensee, or certificate holder shall send the division a signed statement in the form required by the division notifying the division within 10 business days of any change of a mailing address.

(b)  When providing a mailing address, the individual may provide a post office box or other mail drop location.

(2)  An applicant, licensee, or certificate holder is considered to have received a notification that has been sent to the last mailing address furnished to the division by the applicant, licensee, or certificate holder.



Enacted by Chapter 367, 2011 General Session

